Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.150

Permitting use and rental of playgrounds, athletic fields or athletic facilities.

Boards of directors of school districts are hereby authorized to permit the use of, and to rent school playgrounds, athletic fields, or athletic facilities, by, or to, any person or corporation for any athletic contests or athletic purposes.

Permission to use and/or rent said school playgrounds, athletic fields, or athletic facilities shall be for such compensation and under such terms as regulations of the board of directors adopted from time to time so provide.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.048. Prior: (i) 1935 c 99 s 1; Rem. Supp. s4776-1. Formerly RCW 28.58.048. (ii) 1935 c 99 s 2; RRS s 4776-2. Formerly RCW 28A.58.048, 28.58.050.]